Illinois, session 104th, HB2142.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Emergency Services Districts Act is amended 5by changing Sections 2, 3, and 8 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 2005/2)  (from Ch. 85, par. 6852)7    Sec. 2. Any contiguous territory having a population of 8not less than 300 inhabitants and no part of which is already 9included in an emergency services district, and no part of 10which is located in a fire protection district that provides 11rescue services, may be organized as an emergency services 12district as provided in this Act. However, an emergency 13services district may be organized in whole or in part within a 14fire protection district that provides rescue services if the 15emergency services district is formed and operated solely to 16provide ambulance services. 17    Any 5% of the legal voters within the limits of the 18proposed emergency services district may petition the circuit 19court for the county in which the territory lies to order the 20question whether the territory shall be organized as an 21emergency services district under this Act to be submitted to 22the legal voters of the territory, but every petition shall be 23signed by at least 25 legal voters residing within the   HB2142 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11610 RTM 21699 b1territory proposed to be organized as an emergency services 2district, and in case the territory includes more than one 3city, village or incorporated town, or any portions thereof, 4or includes one or more cities, villages or incorporated 5towns, or any portion thereof, and territory not a part of any 6city, village or incorporated town, then the petition must be 7signed by at least 5% of the legal voters residing in each of 8those cities, villages, or incorporated towns, or portions 9thereof, and by at least 5% of the legal voters residing in the 10territory not a part of any city, village or incorporated 11town. The petition shall contain a definite description of the 12boundaries of the territory proposed to be organized as an 13emergency services district, and shall set forth the name of 14the proposed district, which name shall be The .... Emergency 15Services District. If a fire protection district provides 16ambulance service, then an emergency services district formed 17and operated solely to provide ambulance service may be formed 18in part or in whole within that fire protection district as 19long as (i) the board of trustees of the fire protection 20district adopts a resolution to cease its tax levy for 21emergency ambulance service under Section 22 of the Fire 22Protection District Act and (ii) the emergency services 23district is operating an ambulance service that serves the 24portion of the emergency services district located in the fire 25protection district. 26(Source: P.A. 103-134, eff. 1-1-24.)   HB2142 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11610 RTM 21699 b1    (70 ILCS 2005/3)  (from Ch. 85, par. 6853)2    Sec. 3. Upon the filing of a petition in the office of the 3circuit clerk, the court to whom the petition is addressed 4shall give notice of the time and place of a hearing on the 5question of the necessity for the organization of an emergency 6services district and of the boundaries of the proposed 7district. The notice shall be published at least once each 8week for 2 successive weeks in one or more newspapers of 9general circulation in the proposed district. If there is no 10newspaper of general circulation in the proposed district, 11then and a copy of the notice shall be posted in at least 10 of 12the most public places in the proposed district at least 10 13days before the hearing. The hearing shall be held within 20 14days after the petition is filed with the circuit clerk.15    The court shall preside at the hearing, and all persons 16resident within the territory proposed to be organized as an 17emergency services district shall be given an opportunity to 18be heard touching the necessity of the organization of a 19district and to make suggestions regarding the boundaries of 20the district. After hearing the statements, evidence and 21suggestions, if the court determines that considerations of 22public health and welfare make the organization of a district 23necessary, it shall fix the boundaries of the proposed 24emergency services district and, for that purpose and to that 25extent, may alter and amend the petition. In case the   HB2142 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 11610 RTM 21699 b1boundaries as fixed by the court include any territory not 2included in the boundaries as described in the original 3petition, the court shall cause a notice to be inserted at 4least twice in some newspaper of general circulation in the 5additional territory, which notice shall state the time and 6place at which a hearing will be held to permit the owners of 7the land in the additional territory to appear and be heard on 8the question of including the additional territory. The notice 9shall be published at least 10 days before the hearing, and the 10hearing shall be held within 3 weeks after the court first 11fixes the boundaries. The hearing shall be held at a time that 12allows a referendum to create the proposed district to appear 13on the ballot at the next general election. At the hearing the 14boundaries of the proposed district shall be finally fixed by 15the court.16(Source: P.A. 103-134, eff. 1-1-24.) 17    (70 ILCS 2005/8)  (from Ch. 85, par. 6858)18    Sec. 8. The board of trustees of the district shall have 19power to:20        (1) provide ambulance services to the emergency 21    services district;22        (2) take all necessary or proper steps to provide 23    rescue services within the district; 24        (3) borrow money;25        (4) mortgage, pledge, or grant a security interest in   HB2142 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 11610 RTM 21699 b1    any real or personal property of the district;2        (5) to purchase equipment, supplies, and materials;3        (6) buy, sell, and own real estate for the purpose 4    associated with the operation of the emergency services 5    district; 6        (7) to recruit, employ, or contract with ambulance, 7    rescue squad, or both ambulance and rescue squad 8    personnel, who shall be compensated at a rate determined 9    by the board of trustees; and 10        (8) generally to do any and all things necessary or 11    incident to the powers granted by this Act and to carry out 12    the objects of this Act.13(Source: P.A. 103-134, eff. 1-1-24.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.